Washington statutes.
RCW 11.28.040

Procedure during minority or absence of executor.

If the executor be a minor or absent from the state, letters of administration with the will annexed shall be granted, during the time of such minority or absence, to some other person unless there be another executor who shall accept the trust, in which case the estate shall be administered by such other executor until the disqualification shall be removed, when such minor, having arrived at full age, or such absentee, having returned, shall be admitted as joint executor with the former, provided a nonresident of this state may qualify as provided in RCW 11.36.010.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.28.040. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 50; RRS s 1420; prior: Code 1881 s 1374; 1863 p 217 s 108; 1860 p 180 s 75.]